Illinois, session 104th, HB4157.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Senior Citizens and Persons with 5Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act is amended by changing 6Section 4 as follows: 7    (320 ILCS 25/4)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 404)8    Sec. 4. Amount of Grant. 9    (a) In general. Any individual 65 years or older or any 10individual who will become 65 years old during the calendar 11year in which a claim is filed, and any surviving spouse of 12such a claimant, who at the time of death received or was 13entitled to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, which 14surviving spouse will become 65 years of age within the 24 15months immediately following the death of such claimant and 16which surviving spouse but for his or her age is otherwise 17qualified to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, and any 18person with a disability whose annual household income is less 19than the income eligibility limitation, as defined in 20subsection (a-5) and whose household is liable for payment of 21property taxes accrued or has paid rent constituting property 22taxes accrued and is domiciled in this State at the time he or 23she files his or her claim is entitled to claim a grant under   HB4157 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1this Act. With respect to claims filed by individuals who will 2become 65 years old during the calendar year in which a claim 3is filed, the amount of any grant to which that household is 4entitled shall be an amount equal to 1/12 of the amount to 5which the claimant would otherwise be entitled as provided in 6this Section, multiplied by the number of months in which the 7claimant was 65 in the calendar year in which the claim is 8filed.9    (a-5) Income eligibility limitation. For purposes of this 10Section, "income eligibility limitation" means an amount for 11grant years 2008 through 2019:12        (1) less than $22,218 for a household containing one 13    person;14        (2) less than $29,480 for a household containing 2 15    persons; or16        (3) less than $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 17    more persons.18         For grant years 2020 through 2026 and thereafter:19            (A) (1) less than $33,562 for a household 20        containing one person;21            (B) (2) less than $44,533 for a household 22        containing 2 persons; or23            (C) (3) less than $55,500 for a household 24        containing 3 or more persons. 25    For grant years 2027 and 2028, the income eligibility 26limitation amounts shall be increased by an amount equal to   HB4157 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1the percentage increase of the cost-of-living adjustment 2issued by the Social Security Administration. The Department 3on Aging shall determine the dates upon which the new adjusted 4amounts take effect and shall publish the adjusted amounts on 5its website. 6    For 2009 claim year applications submitted during calendar 7year 2010, a household must have annual household income of 8less than $27,610 for a household containing one person; less 9than $36,635 for a household containing 2 persons; or less 10than $45,657 for a household containing 3 or more persons.11     The Department on Aging may adopt rules such that on 12January 1, 2011, and thereafter, the foregoing household 13income eligibility limits may be changed to reflect the annual 14cost of living adjustment in Social Security and Supplemental 15Security Income benefits that are applicable to the year for 16which those benefits are being reported as income on an 17application.18    If a person files as a surviving spouse, then only his or 19her income shall be counted in determining his or her 20household income. 21    (b) Limitation. Except as otherwise provided in 22subsections (a) and (f) of this Section, the maximum amount of 23grant which a claimant is entitled to claim is the amount by 24which the property taxes accrued which were paid or payable 25during the last preceding tax year or rent constituting 26property taxes accrued upon the claimant's residence for the   HB4157 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1last preceding taxable year exceeds 3 1/2% of the claimant's 2household income for that year but in no event is the grant to 3exceed (i) $700 less 4.5% of household income for that year for 4those with a household income of $14,000 or less or (ii) $70 if 5household income for that year is more than $14,000.6    (c) Public aid recipients. If household income in one or 7more months during a year includes cash assistance in excess 8of $55 per month from the Department of Healthcare and Family 9Services or the Department of Human Services (acting as 10successor to the Department of Public Aid under the Department 11of Human Services Act) which was determined under regulations 12of that Department on a measure of need that included an 13allowance for actual rent or property taxes paid by the 14recipient of that assistance, the amount of grant to which 15that household is entitled, except as otherwise provided in 16subsection (a), shall be the product of (1) the maximum amount 17computed as specified in subsection (b) of this Section and 18(2) the ratio of the number of months in which household income 19did not include such cash assistance over $55 to the number 20twelve. If household income did not include such cash 21assistance over $55 for any months during the year, the amount 22of the grant to which the household is entitled shall be the 23maximum amount computed as specified in subsection (b) of this 24Section. For purposes of this paragraph (c), "cash assistance" 25does not include any amount received under the federal 26Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program.  HB4157 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1    (d) Joint ownership. If title to the residence is held 2jointly by the claimant with a person who is not a member of 3his or her household, the amount of property taxes accrued 4used in computing the amount of grant to which he or she is 5entitled shall be the same percentage of property taxes 6accrued as is the percentage of ownership held by the claimant 7in the residence.8    (e) More than one residence. If a claimant has occupied 9more than one residence in the taxable year, he or she may 10claim only one residence for any part of a month. In the case 11of property taxes accrued, he or she shall prorate 1/12 of the 12total property taxes accrued on his or her residence to each 13month that he or she owned and occupied that residence; and, in 14the case of rent constituting property taxes accrued, shall 15prorate each month's rent payments to the residence actually 16occupied during that month.17    (f) (Blank).18    (g) Effective January 1, 2006, there is hereby established 19a program of pharmaceutical assistance to the aged and to 20persons with disabilities, entitled the Illinois Seniors and 21Disabled Drug Coverage Program, which shall be administered by 22the Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 23Department on Aging in accordance with this subsection, to 24consist of coverage of specified prescription drugs on behalf 25of beneficiaries of the program as set forth in this 26subsection. Notwithstanding any provisions of this Act to the   HB4157 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1contrary, on and after July 1, 2012, pharmaceutical assistance 2under this Act shall no longer be provided, and on July 1, 2012 3the Illinois Senior Citizens and Disabled Persons 4Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall terminate. The 5following provisions that concern the Illinois Senior Citizens 6and Disabled Persons Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall 7continue to apply on and after July 1, 2012 to the extent 8necessary to pursue any actions authorized by subsection (d) 9of Section 9 of this Act with respect to acts which took place 10prior to July 1, 2012.11    To become a beneficiary under the program established 12under this subsection, a person must:13        (1) be (i) 65 years of age or older or (ii) a person 14    with a disability; and15        (2) be domiciled in this State; and16        (3) enroll with a qualified Medicare Part D 17    Prescription Drug Plan if eligible and apply for all 18    available subsidies under Medicare Part D; and19        (4) for the 2006 and 2007 claim years, have a maximum 20    household income of (i) less than $21,218 for a household 21    containing one person, (ii) less than $28,480 for a 22    household containing 2 persons, or (iii) less than $35,740 23    for a household containing 3 or more persons; and24        (5) for the 2008 claim year, have a maximum household 25    income of (i) less than $22,218 for a household containing 26    one person, (ii) $29,480 for a household containing 2   HB4157 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1    persons, or (iii) $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 2    more persons; and3        (6) for 2009 claim year applications submitted during 4    calendar year 2010, have annual household income of less 5    than (i) $27,610 for a household containing one person; 6    (ii) less than $36,635 for a household containing 2 7    persons; or (iii) less than $45,657 for a household 8    containing 3 or more persons; and9        (7) as of September 1, 2011, have a maximum household 10    income at or below 200% of the federal poverty level. 11    All individuals enrolled as of December 31, 2005, in the 12pharmaceutical assistance program operated pursuant to 13subsection (f) of this Section and all individuals enrolled as 14of December 31, 2005, in the SeniorCare Medicaid waiver 15program operated pursuant to Section 5-5.12a of the Illinois 16Public Aid Code shall be automatically enrolled in the program 17established by this subsection for the first year of operation 18without the need for further application, except that they 19must apply for Medicare Part D and the Low Income Subsidy under 20Medicare Part D. A person enrolled in the pharmaceutical 21assistance program operated pursuant to subsection (f) of this 22Section as of December 31, 2005, shall not lose eligibility in 23future years due only to the fact that they have not reached 24the age of 65.25    To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department may 26act as an authorized representative of a beneficiary in order   HB4157 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1to enroll the beneficiary in a Medicare Part D Prescription 2Drug Plan if the beneficiary has failed to choose a plan and, 3where possible, to enroll beneficiaries in the low-income 4subsidy program under Medicare Part D or assist them in 5enrolling in that program.6    Beneficiaries under the program established under this 7subsection shall be divided into the following 4 eligibility 8groups:9        (A) Eligibility Group 1 shall consist of beneficiaries 10    who are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage and who 11    are:12            (i) a person with a disability and under age 65; or13            (ii) age 65 or older, with incomes over 200% of the 14        Federal Poverty Level; or15            (iii) age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 16        200% of the Federal Poverty Level and not eligible for 17        federally funded means-tested benefits due to 18        immigration status.19        (B) Eligibility Group 2 shall consist of beneficiaries 20    who are eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.21        (C) Eligibility Group 3 shall consist of beneficiaries 22    age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 200% of the 23    Federal Poverty Level, who are not barred from receiving 24    federally funded means-tested benefits due to immigration 25    status and are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.26        If the State applies and receives federal approval for   HB4157 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1    a waiver under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 2    persons in Eligibility Group 3 shall continue to receive 3    benefits through the approved waiver, and Eligibility 4    Group 3 may be expanded to include persons with 5    disabilities who are under age 65 with incomes under 200% 6    of the Federal Poverty Level who are not eligible for 7    Medicare and who are not barred from receiving federally 8    funded means-tested benefits due to immigration status.9        (D) Eligibility Group 4 shall consist of beneficiaries 10    who are otherwise described in Eligibility Group 2 who 11    have a diagnosis of HIV or AIDS. 12    The program established under this subsection shall cover 13the cost of covered prescription drugs in excess of the 14beneficiary cost-sharing amounts set forth in this paragraph 15that are not covered by Medicare. The Department of Healthcare 16and Family Services may establish by emergency rule changes in 17cost-sharing necessary to conform the cost of the program to 18the amounts appropriated for State fiscal year 2012 and future 19fiscal years except that the 24-month limitation on the 20adoption of emergency rules and the provisions of Sections 215-115 and 5-125 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 22shall not apply to rules adopted under this subsection (g). 23The adoption of emergency rules authorized by this subsection 24(g) shall be deemed to be necessary for the public interest, 25safety, and welfare. 26    For purposes of the program established under this   HB4157 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1subsection, the term "covered prescription drug" has the 2following meanings:3        For Eligibility Group 1, "covered prescription drug" 4    means: (1) any cardiovascular agent or drug; (2) any 5    insulin or other prescription drug used in the treatment 6    of diabetes, including syringe and needles used to 7    administer the insulin; (3) any prescription drug used in 8    the treatment of arthritis; (4) any prescription drug used 9    in the treatment of cancer; (5) any prescription drug used 10    in the treatment of Alzheimer's disease; (6) any 11    prescription drug used in the treatment of Parkinson's 12    disease; (7) any prescription drug used in the treatment 13    of glaucoma; (8) any prescription drug used in the 14    treatment of lung disease and smoking-related illnesses; 15    (9) any prescription drug used in the treatment of 16    osteoporosis; and (10) any prescription drug used in the 17    treatment of multiple sclerosis. The Department may add 18    additional therapeutic classes by rule. The Department may 19    adopt a preferred drug list within any of the classes of 20    drugs described in items (1) through (10) of this 21    paragraph. The specific drugs or therapeutic classes of 22    covered prescription drugs shall be indicated by rule.23        For Eligibility Group 2, "covered prescription drug" 24    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 25    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 26    enrolled.  HB4157 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1        For Eligibility Group 3, "covered prescription drug" 2    means those drugs covered by the Medical Assistance 3    Program under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code.4        For Eligibility Group 4, "covered prescription drug" 5    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 6    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 7    enrolled.8    Any person otherwise eligible for pharmaceutical 9assistance under this subsection whose covered drugs are 10covered by any public program is ineligible for assistance 11under this subsection to the extent that the cost of those 12drugs is covered by the other program.13    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 14establish by rule the methods by which it will provide for the 15coverage called for in this subsection. Those methods may 16include direct reimbursement to pharmacies or the payment of a 17capitated amount to Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans.18    For a pharmacy to be reimbursed under the program 19established under this subsection, it must comply with rules 20adopted by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 21regarding coordination of benefits with Medicare Part D 22Prescription Drug Plans. A pharmacy may not charge a 23Medicare-enrolled beneficiary of the program established under 24this subsection more for a covered prescription drug than the 25appropriate Medicare cost-sharing less any payment from or on 26behalf of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.  HB4157 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 15504 KTG 28667 b1    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services or the 2Department on Aging, as appropriate, may adopt rules regarding 3applications, counting of income, proof of Medicare status, 4mandatory generic policies, and pharmacy reimbursement rates 5and any other rules necessary for the cost-efficient operation 6of the program established under this subsection.7    (h) A qualified individual is not entitled to duplicate 8benefits in a coverage period as a result of the changes made 9by this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. 10(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19.)